California, session 20252026, AB2648.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17.2 of the Penal Code is amended to read:17.2. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the disposition of any a criminal case use the least restrictive means available.(b) The court presiding over a criminal matter shall consider alternatives to incarceration, including, without limitation, collaborative justice court programs, diversion, restorative justice, and probation.(c) The court shall have the discretion to determine the appropriate sentence according to relevant statutes and the sentencing rules of the Judicial Council.